Louisiana, session 2026, HB1245.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:4(65) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4. Applicability
This Chapter shall not apply:
* * *
(65)(a) To the record of arrests and prosecutions, also known as the "rap
sheet", contained in the criminal history records of any person who serves as a
witness in a criminal proceeding and which records are in the custody of the clerk
of court, unless the records are voluntarily released by the person, otherwise
available to the general public, or released by court order.
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph, "criminal history records" means records
collected and maintained by the Criminal Justice Information Services Division of
the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Louisiana Computerized Criminal History
System operated by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.